Utah statutes.
23-23-10.   Possession of permits and licenses by hunter -- Restrictions.

(1)  A person may not hunt in a cooperative wildlife management unit without having in his or her possession:

(a)  a valid cooperative wildlife management unit authorization or permit or other permit as authorized by the wildlife board; and

(b)  the necessary hunting licenses, tags, and stamps.

(2)  A cooperative wildlife management unit authorization or permit:

(a)  entitles the holder to hunt only in the unit specified on the authorization or permit pursuant to rules and proclamations of the Wildlife Board and does not entitle the holder to hunt on any other private or public land; and

(b)  constitutes written permission for trespass as required under Section 23-20-14.

